Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE A. HEALTH COVERAGE IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 1206. DENIAL OF HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN ENROLLMENT BASED ON EXISTING COVERAGE PROHIBITED

Sec. 1206.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to a health benefit plan, including a small employer health benefit plan written under Chapter 1501, that provides benefits for medical or surgical expenses incurred as a result of a health condition, accident, or sickness, including an individual, group, blanket, or franchise insurance policy or insurance agreement, a group hospital service contract, or an individual or group evidence of coverage or similar coverage document that is offered by:

(1) an insurance company;

(2) a group hospital service corporation operating under Chapter 842;

(3) a fraternal benefit society operating under Chapter 885;

(4) a stipulated premium company operating under Chapter 884;

(5) a reciprocal exchange operating under Chapter 942;

(6) a health maintenance organization operating under Chapter 843;

(7) a multiple employer welfare arrangement that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 846; or

(8) an approved nonprofit health corporation that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 844.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1206.002. EXCEPTION. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a plan that provides coverage:

(A) only for a specified disease or for another limited benefit;

(B) only for accidental death or dismemberment;

(C) for wages or payments in lieu of wages for a period during which an employee is absent from work because of sickness or injury;

(D) as a supplement to a liability insurance policy;

(E) for credit insurance;

(F) only for dental or vision care;

(G) only for hospital expenses;

(H) only for indemnity for hospital confinement; or

(I) in accordance with Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1397aa et seq.);

(2) a Medicare supplemental policy as defined by Section 1882(g)(1), Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1395ss), as amended;

(3) a workers' compensation insurance policy;

(4) medical payment insurance coverage provided under a motor vehicle insurance policy; or

(5) a long-term care insurance policy, including a nursing home fixed indemnity policy, unless the commissioner determines that the policy provides benefit coverage so comprehensive that the policy is a health benefit plan as described by Section 1206.001.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1206.003. DENIAL OF ENROLLMENT PROHIBITED. A health benefit plan issuer may not refuse to enroll an individual in the plan solely because the individual is enrolled in another health benefit plan at the time the individual applies for coverage under the plan.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1206.004. VIOLATION OF CHAPTER: UNFAIR DISCRIMINATION. A health benefit plan issuer who violates this chapter engages in unfair discrimination under Subchapter B, Chapter 544.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.